Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.200

Assessments—When due and payable—Collection.

Such assessments on tree fruits shall be due and payable by the producer thereof by the end of the next business day that such tree fruits are sold or shipped for sale unless such time is extended as provided for in RCW 15.26.210 by rule or regulation of the commission. The commission may by rule or regulation provide that such assessments shall be collected from the producer and remitted by the person purchasing, or receiving such tree fruit for sale, processing, or shipment anywhere.

[ 1969 c 129 s 20.]